Utah statutes.
78A-2-109.   Courts to provide information and statistical data to administrator of the courts.

The judges, clerks of the courts, and all other officers, state and local, shall comply with all requests made by the administrator or his assistants for information and statistical data bearing on the state of the dockets of the courts and such other information as may reflect the business transacted by them and the expenditure of public money for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system.

